Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-103
Oaths; members may administer.

Any member may administer oaths in the Legislature, and while acting on a committee may administer oaths on the business of such committee.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 5, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 3744;

C.S.1922, § 3137;

C.S.1929, § 50-103;

R.S.1943, § 50-103.

Although this section provides that any member of the Legislature "May administer oaths in the Legislature, and while acting on a committee may administer oaths on the business of such committee" no Nebraska statute requires that an oath be administered to individuals testifying before a legislative committee. State v. Douglas, 222 Neb. 833, 388 N.W.2d 801 (1986).